Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1305.01
Projects for which federal funds are available; department; powers and duties.

The department may plan, design, construct, maintain, or otherwise undertake projects for which federal funds are available as a National Highway System project under 23 U.S.C. 103(i), as a Surface Transportation Program project under 23 U.S.C. 133(b), or as a Public Lands Highways Program project under 23 U.S.C. 204(h). The department may expend state funds to enable the state to participate in the benefits to be secured from these federal program funds. In accordance with the department's authority set out in sections 39-1306, 39-1307, and 39-1308, the department may assist any state agency, the Nebraska State Historical Society, the Game and Parks Commission, the University of Nebraska, any political or governmental subdivision, or any public corporation of this state in soliciting and expending federal funds under the federal acts listed in this section.

Laws 1993, LB 15, § 5.